Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2216
Registrar; powers.

The acts and orders which this code specifies as performable by the registrar may be performed either by a judge of the court or by a person, including the clerk, designated by the court by a written order filed and recorded in the office of the court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 16, UPC § 1-307.